Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 22 Exchange of Information in Support of Child Support Collection

15-22-1.
Access to information.

The department of human services, office of child support services, and/or any other state or federal agency taking action to establish paternity, establish or modify child support and/or medical orders, enforce child support and/or medical orders, or to locate an individual for these reasons, shall have access to and may request information from the individuals and the entities named in this section. The information shall be available to the department only for the purpose of and to the extent necessary for the administration of the child support enforcement program. No entity or individual who complies with this section shall be liable in any civil or criminal action or proceeding brought by an obligor or an obligee on account of compliance. Holders maintaining personal data are authorized to disclose to the department all personal data requested pursuant to this section, and the disclosures shall not violate the provisions of §

38-2-2

. Any entity or individual who, without reasonable cause, fails to reply to a request pursuant to this subsection or who, without reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request within twenty (20) days of receipt, shall be liable for a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, to be assessed by the department or by the family court. The department may secure information to which it is entitled by any method including, but not limited to, requests by paper, facsimile, telephone, magnetic tape, or other electronic means.

Information to which the department shall be entitled includes, but is not limited to, state income tax returns and all state income tax information, including address, filing status, and the number of dependents reported on any return filed by any obligor, any other information, the contents and nature of which shall be determined and approved by the tax administrator, and the federal tax data as permitted by federal law.

The information included in this provision shall be data or tax returns in any form or format, including data available by electronic means which is directly related to the obligor.

Unless otherwise limited by statute, the department shall be entitled to all criminal offender record information of the obligor which is necessary to locate the obligor or establish the obligor’s ability to pay including, but not limited to, national criminal information center (NCIC) records and bureau of criminal identification (BCI) records maintained by the department of the attorney general and the quarterly contribution reports of the department of labor and training.

Unless otherwise limited by federal statute, the department may require electronic disclosure of information relating to the obligor including, but not limited to, the obligor’s location, employment, title to property, credit status, or professional affiliation to assist the department to determine the current whereabouts of an obligor from any source including, but not limited to, any state or municipal agency, utility company, including telephone, cell phone company, assessor’s offices, and housing authorities, employers, professional or trade associations and labor unions, professional or trade licensing boards, banks and other financial institutions, credit bureaus or agencies, or any other individual or entity which the department has reason to believe may have information that relates to or may assist in the location of the obligor. The failure of an individual or entity to provide the department, within the time and in the manner that the department may provide by regulation, with information relating to, or that may assist in locating, an obligor shall be punishable by a civil penalty to be assessed by the family court or the department of human services, office of child support services in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each failure, and the individual or entity shall be required to provide the information.

In requiring information about an obligor from a telephone company; including a cell phone company, the department shall be limited to obtaining the billing and/or residential address of the obligor. No location information, including, but not limited to, global positioning system data, that in whole or in part, is generated by or derived from the operation of such device shall be sought or received.

The department may request from any employer or other source of income whom the department has reason to believe employs an obligor, or otherwise provides the obligor with regular periodic income, information concerning the dates and amounts of income paid, the last known address, social security number, and available health care benefits. The department shall not inquire of an employer or other source of income concerning the same obligor more than once every three months. Employers or other sources of income shall respond to the requests truthfully and in writing. No employer or other source of income who complies with this section shall be liable in any civil action or proceeding brought by the obligor on account of such compliance. Any employer or other source of income who, without good cause, fails to comply with a request as required by this section, within twenty (20) days of receipt of the request, shall be liable for a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day of violation to be assessed by the family court or the department of administration, division of taxation, and shall be required to provide the information.

The department shall use the information gathered pursuant to this chapter only for purposes of administering the child support enforcement program and shall not disclose the information, other than the name and address of the obligor, except in proceedings or other activities to locate or identify obligors, to evaluate the ability of obligors to pay child support, to establish, modify, or enforce child support orders, to collect child support, or in criminal prosecutions for failure to pay child support. Any employee of the department that uses or discloses the information in any other manner shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 12; P.L. 2013, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 231, § 1.

15-22-2.
Financial institution data matches.

The department of administration, division of taxation, shall enter into cooperative agreements with financial institutions further defined as any bank, savings association, federal or state credit union, benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money-market mutual fund or similar entity authorized to do business in the state, to develop and operate a data match system using automated data exchanges to the maximum extent feasible on a quarterly basis, listing each noncustodial parent provided by the department in the exchange who maintains an account at the financial institution and who owes past due support in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500). The financial exchange shall include, but not be limited to, the name, address, date of birth and social security number or other taxpayer identification number, the asset description, account number and account balance and any and all information required pursuant to §

15-21-2

for the purpose of establishing an administrative lien. The financial institution shall not be liable to any person for any disclosure to the state agency, for encumbering or surrendering any assets held by the financial institution in response to a notice of lien or levy issued by the state pursuant to chapter 21 of this title, or for any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 13.

15-22-3.
Administrative subpoena.

The department of administration, division of taxation, and any other state or federal agency taking action to establish paternity, establish or modify child support or medical orders, enforce child support orders or location of individuals for the above, shall be authorized to issue subpoenas as appropriate to the individuals and entities named in this chapter to secure financial and other information relating to the obligor for the purpose of and to the extent necessary for the administration of the child support enforcement program.

Any entity or individual who fails to reply to an administrative subpoena shall be liable for a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for the violation, to be assessed by the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, or the Rhode Island family court, and shall be required to provide the information and/or comply with the request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 13.

15-22-4.
Personal data — Purposes for which disclosure permitted — Safeguards — Exceptions — Unauthorized inspection or disclosure — Penalties.

Personal data collected and maintained by the agency created pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., (subsequently referred to as the IV-D agency) shall not be a public record and access to this data shall be available only to employees of the IV-D agency and/or its contractors, and only to the extent reasonably necessary for the performance of the employees or contractors duties. The IV-D agency may disclose personal data for purposes connected with establishing paternity, establishing, modifying or enforcing child support and medical obligations pursuant to this chapter and title IV, part D of the Social Security Act. The IV-D agency may disclose personal data:

To any state or federal public assistance program or to the IV-D agency of another state for purposes connected with the administration of the program or of the child support enforcement program, as authorized by title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., and by the secretary of the federal department of health and human services;

To persons authorized to receive information from the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.;

To the director of the department of human services or his or her agent for purposes directly connected with detecting and preventing fraud in any assistance program administered by the department;

To the department of children, youth and families for purposes directly connected with an investigation or proceedings related to termination of parental rights, adoption, or foster care parental support actions;

To a person authorized in writing by the parent or, in the case of the child, by the custodial parent or legal guardian of the child, to receive personal data;

For purposes directly connected to obtaining health care coverage for a child receiving services pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., to an employer or provider of health care coverage or to the obligor;

In the case of personal data about an individual parent, to that parent or, in the case of personal data about the child, to the custodial parent or legal guardian of the child; or

To any other individual, business or entity for the purposes of administering the child support enforcement program or otherwise provided by federal or state law.

Before disclosing personal data pursuant to this section, the IV-D agency shall require the person or agency requesting the data to verify in writing, in a form provided by child support enforcement that the data is required for a purpose permitted by this section and that the data will be used solely for this purpose. The IV-D agency shall limit disclosure to the specific data required by the person or agency to carry out a purpose permitted by this chapter.

The IV-D agency shall safeguard personal data if the IV-D agency is provided with reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence. A state agency, court, IV-D agency of another state, obligor, obligee, and any other persons or entities that the IV-D agency may specify may provide the IV-D agency with reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence in any manner that the IV-D agency may require. The IV-D agency shall continue to safeguard personal data until the time that the individual contacts this agency in writing to advise that his or her personal data need not be safeguarded. For the purposes of this section, a “history of domestic violence” means that an individual has been subjected to:

Physical acts that resulted in, or threatened to result in, physical injury to the individual;

Sexual abuse;

Sexual activity involving a dependent child;

Being forced as the caretaker relative of a dependent child to engage in nonconsensual sexual acts or activities;

Threats of, or attempts at, physical or sexual abuse;

Mental abuse; or

Neglect or deprivation of medical care.

If the IV-D agency is provided with reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence, the IV-D agency, its employees, and its contractors shall indicate this fact to the federal registry and shall not disclose any personal data that could otherwise be disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section about the location of a parent or child, including residential address, telephone number, and name, address and telephone number of employer, and shall not disclose the social security number of a parent or child. However, the IV-D agency may disclose such personal data to:

The Federal Parent Locator Service;

A court or agency of a court that is authorized to receive information pursuant to court order from the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.;

The department of human services;

The department of children, youth and families for purposes directly connected with an investigation of proceedings related to termination of parental rights, adoption or parental support action; or

A person authorized to receive personal data by the parent or, in the case of the child, by the custodial parent or legal guardian of the child.

The IV-D agency may disclose the social security number of a child receiving IV-D services for purposes directly connected to obtaining health care coverage for the child to an employer or provider of health care coverage.

If the IV-D agency is provided with reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence pursuant to this section, the IV-D agency shall notify the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., that a risk of harm exists. A person or agency seeking disclosure of personal data which the IV-D agency is prohibited from disclosing because of reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence, but which could otherwise be disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, may file a petition with the family court pursuant to §

15-22-5

to request disclosure of the personal data. Upon written request by a court or agent of a court authorized to receive information from the Federal Parent Locator Service, the IV-D agency shall release personal data, which may include location information and social security numbers, to the court or agent, as required by title IV, part D of the Social Security Act; provided, that if the IV-D agency has been provided with reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence, the IV-D agency shall notify the court or agent that the IV-D agency has received this information and that, pursuant to section (b) of this section, before the IV-D agency may make any disclosure of personal data under this section, the court is required to determine whether the disclosure to any other person could be harmful to the parent or child and issue a court order to that effect.

The IV-D agency shall have in effect safeguards to ensure the integrity, accuracy, and completeness of, access to, and use of data, including personal data and data in the automated system which shall include:

Written policies concerning access to data by IV-D agency personnel and its contractors, and sharing of data with other individuals, businesses, or entities, which permit access to and use of data only to the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of the child support enforcement program and which specify the data which may be used for particular program purpose, and the personnel permitted access to the data;

Systems controls to ensure strict adherence to the policies;

Routine monitoring of access to and use of the automated system, through methods such as audit trails, to guard against and promptly identify unauthorized access or use;

Procedures to ensure that all personnel, including employees of the IV-D agency and its contractors, who may have or had access to or who may be or were required to use confidential program data and personal data, are informed of applicable requirements and penalties, including those in this section, § 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 6103, and are adequately trained in security procedures;

Penalties, as provided in this section, for willful inspection or disclosure of, or unauthorized access to, personal data; and

Any other safeguards that the commissioner of revenue and the secretary of the federal department of health and human services may specify in regulations.

The willful inspection or disclosure of personal data, except as authorized by subsection (b) of this section, by any employee of the IV-D agency, its contractors, or any person obtaining unauthorized access to the data, including data stored in a computer system or computer files, while the data is in the custody of the division of taxation, child support enforcement, or in the custody of any employee of the IV-D agency or its contractors, is prohibited. Personal data may be inspected and shared by and between employees of the IV-D agency in the performance of their official duties as provided in this chapter. Authorized employees of the division of taxation, child support enforcement, may disclose personal data to any employee of a contractor of the IV-D agency to the extent necessary for performance of the contracted duties of the employee. Any violation of this section by an employee of the IV-D agency, its contractors or an officer, director or employee of its contractors, a person obtaining unauthorized access to personal data, or any other individual shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, with respect to each person concerning whom information has been disclosed or inspected. The determination by child support enforcement that an employee of the IV-D agency, or the determination of another agency head that an employee of any other agency, has made a disclosure or willful inspection of personal data that was not authorized by this section and not protected by the good faith provision of subsection (d) of this section shall be grounds for dismissal of that employee. A violation, as determined by child support enforcement, of this section by an officer, director, or employee of any contractor of the state, or any officer, director or employee of the state, shall also be cause for terminating any current contract between that contractor and the state and for prohibiting that contractor from entering into any future contract with the state.

Any unauthorized disclosure or unauthorized inspection made in a good faith effort to comply with this section shall not be considered a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 272, § 1.

15-22-5.
Disclosure of personal data prohibited — Petition for disclosure — Motion to seal court files — Determination of harm — Limited disclosure.

A person or agency, including the IV-D agency, seeking personal data which the IV-D agency is prohibited from disclosing because of a history of domestic violence but which could otherwise be disclosed pursuant to §

15-22-1(a)

, or which the Federal Parent Locator Service established pursuant to title IV, part D of the Social Security Act is prohibited from disclosing because the secretary of the federal department of health and human services has been notified that there is reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence, may file a petition with the family court to request disclosure of the personal data. The petition shall specify the purposes for which the personal data is required. When a petition is filed under this section, or when the court receives notice from the IV-D agency through a motion to seal the file or otherwise, that the IV-D agency has been notified of a history of domestic violence pursuant to §

15-22-4

, the court shall determine whether disclosure of personal data could be harmful to the parent or child before releasing the data to any other person or agency. The parent may provide the information in writing and shall not be required to appear in person to contest the release of information. The court shall also notify the IV-D agency of any petition to disclose files pursuant to this section, and the IV-D agency shall provide the court with any reasonable evidence of a history of domestic violence when it has been provided to the IV-D agency pursuant to §

15-22-4

. The court may also request information directly from the Federal Parent Locator Service, from the IV-D agency of another state, and from any other source.

In determining whether disclosure of personal data meets the definition of a history of domestic violence and could be harmful to the parent or child, the court shall consider any relevant information provided by the parent or child, any information provided by the IV-D agency or by the IV-D agency of another state, any evidence provided by the person seeking the personal data, whether the address of the parent or child has been impounded, and any other relevant evidence, including information contained in the records of the statewide domestic violence record keeping system. Documentary evidence transmitted to the court by facsimile, telecopier, or other means that do not provide an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission. The court may permit a party or witness to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means.

The court shall not enter an order to disclose personal data without reviewing all of the information that has been provided to the court and shall not draw an adverse inference from the failure of the parent to appear in person to contest disclosure of information.

The court may, upon motion by any party, or the division of taxation, child support enforcement, or on its own, enter an order:

Sealing the file and prohibiting any disclosure of confidential information by the court or its agents;

Obliterating location information contained in the court file;

Permitting disclosure by the court or its agents to a specific person or persons;

Prohibiting disclosure by the court or its agents to a specific person or persons; or

Removing any restrictions on disclosure by the court and its agents.

An order permitting disclosure of personal data may specify the purposes for which the data may be used and may prohibit a person to whom the data is disclosed from making further disclosures to any other person. The court shall notify the IV-D agency of any order entered pursuant to this section. Any person or agency who violates an order issued pursuant to this section may be held in contempt of court and subject to the penalties provided in §

15-22-4(c)(2)

.

The court may disclose location information about a parent for the limited purpose of notifying the parent of a proceeding under this section or of any other proceeding in the probate and family court, provided that the information shall not be disclosed to another party unless the court issues an order pursuant to this section permitting the disclosure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 9.